Mississippi statutes. Title 31. Public Business, Bonds and Obligations
Timely Payment for Purchases by Public Bodies

§ 31-7-301.
Legislative findings; meaning of term “public bodies.”

The Legislature hereby declares that it is essential to the efficient operation of public bodies of this state that adequate supplies of goods and services continue to be available from private sources; that the good name and credit of the state may be promoted by timely and responsible payment of just claims; and that fair compensation be awarded suppliers when payments of their claims are delayed without justification.

The term “public bodies” shall mean all state agencies, political subdivisions, school districts, municipalities and public corporations, whether created by charter, statute or executive order, whether supported wholly or in part by public funds, or which expend public funds.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 489, § 1, eff from and after October 1, 1986.

§ 31-7-303.
Time for filing requisition for payment of invoice; time for mailing warrant in payment of invoice.

The requisition for payment of an invoice submitted to a public body and required by law to be filed with the State Fiscal Management Board shall be filed with the State Fiscal Management Board not later than thirty (30) days after receipt of the invoice and receipt, inspection and approval of the goods or services, except that in the case of a bona fide dispute the requisition for payment shall contain a statement of the dispute and authorize payment only in the amount not disputed. If a requisition for payment filed within the thirty-day period is returned by the State Fiscal Management Board because of an error, it shall nevertheless be deemed timely filed. The thirty-day filing requirement may be waived by the State Fiscal Management Board on a showing of exceptional circumstances in accordance with rules and regulations established by the State Fiscal Management Board.

The warrant, in payment of an invoice submitted to a public body of the state, shall be mailed or otherwise delivered by the public body not later than fifteen (15) days after filing of the requisition for payment; however, this requirement may be waived by the State Fiscal Management Board on a showing of exceptional circumstances in accordance with rules and regulations of the State Fiscal Management Board or as otherwise provided in Section 7-7-35, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 489, § 2, eff from and after October 1, 1986.

§ 31-7-305.
Recordkeeping and notice requirements; time for mailing check in payment of invoice; time for payment in event of dispute; interest penalties.

All public bodies of the state, including those which issue checks and those which file requisitions for payment with the State Fiscal Management Board, shall keep a record of the date of receipt of the invoice, dates of receipt, inspection and approval of the goods or services, date of issuing the check or date of filing the requisition for payment, as the case may be, and date of mailing or otherwise delivering the warrant or check in payment thereof. In the event that the State Fiscal Management Board mails or otherwise delivers the warrant directly to the claimant, pursuant to Section 7-7-35, Mississippi Code of 1972, the State Fiscal Management Board shall notify the public body of the date thereof. The provisions of this section are supplemental to the requirements of Sections 19-13-29, 21-39-7, 21-39-13 and 37-5-93, Mississippi Code of 1972.

All public bodies that are authorized to issue checks in payment of goods and services and are not required to issue requisitions for payment to the State Fiscal Management Board shall mail or otherwise deliver such checks no later than forty-five (45) days after receipt of the invoice and receipt, inspection and approval of the goods or services; however, in the event of a bona fide dispute, the public body shall pay only the amount not disputed.

If a warrant or check, as the case may be, in payment of an invoice is not mailed or otherwise delivered within forty-five (45) days after receipt of the invoice and receipt, inspection and approval of the goods and services, the public body shall be liable to the vendor, in addition to the amount of the invoice, for interest at a rate of one and one-half percent (1-1/2 %) per month or portion thereof on the unpaid balance from the expiration of such forty-five-day period until such time as the warrant or check is mailed or otherwise delivered to the vendor. The provisions of this paragraph shall apply only to undisputed amounts for which payment has been authorized. In the case of an error on the part of the vendor, the forty-five-day period shall begin to run upon receipt of a corrected invoice by the public body and upon compliance with the other provisions of this section. The various public bodies shall be responsible for initiating the penalty payments required by this subsection and shall use this subsection as authority to make such payments. Also, at the time of initiating such penalty payment, the public body shall specify in writing an explanation of the delay and shall attach such explanation to the requisition for payment of the penalty or to the file copy of the check issued by the public body, as the case may be.

In the event of a bona fide dispute as to an invoice, or any portion thereof, the dispute shall be settled within thirty (30) days after interest penalties could begin to be assessed, if it were not for the dispute.

If a warrant or check, as the case may be, in payment of an invoice, subject to a prior dispute, is not mailed or otherwise delivered within thirty (30) days after settlement of the dispute, the public body shall be liable to the vendor, in addition to the amount of the invoice, for interest at a rate of one and one-half percent (1-1/2 %) per month or portion thereof on the unpaid balance from the expiration of said thirty-day period until such time as the warrant or check is mailed or otherwise delivered to the vendor. At the time of initiating such penalty payment, the public body shall specify in writing an explanation of the delay and shall attach such explanation to the requisition for payment of the penalty or to the file copy of the check issued by the public body, as the case may be. The interest penalty prescribed in this paragraph shall be in lieu of the penalty provided in subsection (3).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 489, § 3, eff from and after October 1, 1986.

§ 31-7-307.
Disclosure of late payments and interest penalties; preferential payment of certain invoices to obtain discount.

The budget request submitted by a public body to the Legislature shall specifically disclose the amount of any interest paid by any public body pursuant to Sections 31-7-301 through 31-7-317. However, no provision of Sections 31-7-301 through 31-7-317 authorizes a new appropriation to cover such interest penalties, and public bodies shall not seek to increase appropriations for the purpose of obtaining funds to pay any interest penalties.

All public bodies of the state, including those which issue checks and those which file requisitions for payment with the State Fiscal Management Board, shall monthly notify the State Fiscal Management Board of the number and dollar amount of late payments by the public body along with the amounts of interest paid and the specific steps being taken to reduce the incidence of late payments.

If the terms of the invoice provide a discount for payment in less than forty-five (45) days, public bodies shall preferentially process it and use all diligence to obtain the savings by compliance with the invoice terms, if it would be cost effective.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 489, § 4, eff from and after October 1, 1986.

§ 31-7-309.
Recovery of attorney’s fees in action to collect interest penalty.

Whenever a vendor brings formal administrative or judicial action to collect interest due under Sections 31-7-301 through 31-7-317, the public body shall be required to pay any reasonable attorney’s fees if the vendor prevails.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 489, § 5, eff from and after October 1, 1986.

§ 31-7-311.
Annual summary of payment record.

The State Fiscal Management Board shall submit to the Appropriations Committee of each house of the Legislature by January 15 of each year a report summarizing the payment record for the preceding fiscal year. The report shall include the number and dollar amount of late payments by each public body along with the amounts of interest paid and the specific steps being taken to reduce the incidence of late payments.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 489, § 6, eff from and after October 1, 1986.

§ 31-7-313.
Adoption and promulgation of rules and regulations.

The State Fiscal Management Board is authorized and directed to adopt and promulgate rules and regulations necessary to implement this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 489, § 7, eff from and after October 1, 1986.

§ 31-7-315.
Relation to provisions governing payments under public works contracts.

Sections 31-7-301 through 31-7-317 shall not affect payment under public works contracts as provided in Sections 31-5-25 and 31-5-27, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 489, § 8, eff from and after October 1, 1986.

§ 31-7-317.
Feasibility studies.

The Governor’s Office of General Services shall study the feasibility of:

Requiring the Bureau of Purchasing to act as purchasing agent for state agencies;

Requiring the Bureau of Purchasing to purchase frequently used products and supplies and warehouse them for state agencies, especially in the Jackson metropolitan area; and

A small business/minority set-aside program.

On or before January 15, 1987, the Governor’s Office of General Services shall transmit its written report of the feasibility studies to the Legislature, along with its recommendations and an estimate of the fiscal impact of the recommendations. If the Governor’s Office of General Services recommends that the bureau should be required to act as purchasing agent for smaller state agencies, the report shall include a list of state agencies to be included.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 489, § , eff from and after passage (approved April 15, 1986).